hunspell/kk_KZ.modified.aff
SFX k N 54
SFX k 0 дардан [аоуұыэ]ж sf:дардан:0
SFX k 0 дардан [аоуұыэ]з sf:дардан:0
SFX k 0 дардан [аоуұыэ]л sf:дардан:0
SFX k 0 дардан [аоуұыэ]м sf:дардан:0
SFX k 0 дардан [аоуұыэ]н sf:дардан:0
SFX k 0 дардан [аоуұыэ]ң sf:дардан:0
SFX k 0 дерден [әеёиөүіюя]ж sf:дерден:0
SFX k 0 дерден [әеёиөүіюя]з sf:дерден:0
SFX k 0 дерден [әеёиөүіюя]л sf:дерден:0
SFX k 0 дерден [әеёиөүіюя]м sf:дерден:0
SFX k 0 дерден [әеёиөүіюя]н sf:дерден:0
SFX k 0 дерден [әеёиөүіюя]ң sf:дерден:0
SFX k 0 лардан [аоуұыэ] sf:лардан:0
SFX k 0 лардан [аоуұыэ]й sf:лардан:0
SFX k 0 дардан [аоуұыэ]р sf:дардан:0
SFX k 0 лардан [аоуұыэ]у sf:лардан:0
SFX k 0 лерден [әеёиөүіюя] sf:лерден:0
SFX k 0 лерден [әеёиөүіюя]й sf:лерден:0
SFX k 0 дерден [әеёиөүіюя]р sf:дерден:0
SFX k 0 лерден [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:лерден:0
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]б sf:тардан:0
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]в sf:тардан:0
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]г sf:тардан:0
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]ғ sf:тардан:0
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]д sf:тардан:0
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]к sf:тардан:0
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]қ sf:тардан:0
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]һ sf:тардан:0
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]п sf:тардан:0
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]с sf:тардан:0
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]т sf:тардан:0
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]ф sf:тардан:0
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]х sf:тардан:0
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]ц sf:тардан:0
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]ч sf:тардан:0
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]ш sf:тардан:0
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]щ sf:тардан:0
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]б sf:терден:0
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]в sf:терден:0
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]г sf:терден:0
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]ғ sf:терден:0
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]д sf:терден:0
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]к sf:терден:0
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]қ sf:терден:0
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]һ sf:терден:0
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]п sf:терден:0
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]с sf:терден:0
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]т sf:терден:0
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]ф sf:терден:0
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]х sf:терден:0
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]ц sf:терден:0
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]ч sf:терден:0
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]ш sf:терден:0
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]щ sf:терден:0
SFX L N 6
SFX L 0 бен [жз] sf:бен:0
SFX L 0 бенен [жз] sf:бенен:0
SFX L 0 мен [аоуұыэәеёиөүіюяйлмнңру] sf:мен:0
SFX L 0 менен [аоуұыэәеёиөүіюяйлмнңру] sf:менен:0
SFX L 0 пен [бвгғдкқпстфхһцчшщ] sf:пен:0
SFX L 0 пенен [бвгғдкқпстфхһцчшщ] sf:пенен:0
SFX l N 8
SFX l 0 дармен [жзлмнң] sf:дармен:0
SFX l 0 дарменен [жзлмнң] sf:дарменен:0
SFX l 0 лармен [аоуұыэйр] sf:лармен:0
SFX l 0 ларменен [аоуұыэйр] sf:ларменен:0
SFX l 0 лермен [әеёиөүіюя] sf:лермен:0
SFX l 0 лерменен [әеёиөүіюя] sf:лерменен:0
SFX l 0 тармен [бвгғдкқпстфхһцчшщ] sf:тармен:0
SFX l 0 тарменен [бвгғдкқпстфхһцчшщ] sf:тарменен:0
SFX M N 51
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]бу sf:іп:1
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ву sf:іп:1
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]гу sf:іп:1
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ғу sf:іп:1
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ду sf:іп:1
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]жу sf:іп:1
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]зу sf:іп:1
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ку sf:іп:1
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]қу sf:іп:1
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]лу sf:іп:1
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]му sf:іп:1
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ну sf:іп:1
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ңу sf:іп:1
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]һу sf:іп:1
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]пу sf:іп:1
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ру sf:іп:1
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]су sf:іп:1
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ту sf:іп:1
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]фу sf:іп:1
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ху sf:іп:1
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]цу sf:іп:1
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]чу sf:іп:1
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]шу sf:іп:1
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]щу sf:іп:1
SFX M у п [аоуұыэәеёиөүіюя]у sf:п:1
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]бу sf:ып:1
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]ву sf:ып:1
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]гу sf:ып:1
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]ғу sf:ып:1
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]ду sf:ып:1
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]жу sf:ып:1
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]зу sf:ып:1
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]ку sf:ып:1
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]қу sf:ып:1
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]лу sf:ып:1
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]му sf:ып:1
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]ну sf:ып:1
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]ңу sf:ып:1
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]һу sf:ып:1
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]пу sf:ып:1
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]ру sf:ып:1
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]су sf:ып:1
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]ту sf:ып:1
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]фу sf:ып:1
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]ху sf:ып:1
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]цу sf:ып:1
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]чу sf:ып:1
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]шу sf:ып:1
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]щу sf:ып:1
SFX M ю йіп [әеёиөүіюя]ю sf:йіп:1
SFX M ю йып [аоуұыэ]ю sf:йып:1
SFX m N 51
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]бу sf:іп:1
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ву sf:іп:1
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]гу sf:іп:1
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ғу sf:іп:1
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ду sf:іп:1
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]жу sf:іп:1
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]зу sf:іп:1
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ку sf:іп:1
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]қу sf:іп:1
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]лу sf:іп:1
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]му sf:іп:1
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ну sf:іп:1
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ңу sf:іп:1
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]һу sf:іп:1
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]пу sf:іп:1
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ру sf:іп:1
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]су sf:іп:1
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ту sf:іп:1
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]фу sf:іп:1
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ху sf:іп:1
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]цу sf:іп:1
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]чу sf:іп:1
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]шу sf:іп:1
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]щу sf:іп:1
SFX m у п [аоуұыэәеёиөүіюя]у sf:п:1
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]бу sf:ып:1
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]ву sf:ып:1
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]гу sf:ып:1
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]ғу sf:ып:1
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]ду sf:ып:1
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]жу sf:ып:1
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]зу sf:ып:1
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]ку sf:ып:1
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]қу sf:ып:1
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]лу sf:ып:1
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]му sf:ып:1
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]ну sf:ып:1
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]ңу sf:ып:1
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]һу sf:ып:1
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]пу sf:ып:1
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]ру sf:ып:1
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]су sf:ып:1
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]ту sf:ып:1
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]фу sf:ып:1
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]ху sf:ып:1
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]цу sf:ып:1
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]чу sf:ып:1
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]шу sf:ып:1
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]щу sf:ып:1
SFX m ю йіп [әеёиөүіюя]ю sf:йіп:1
SFX m ю йып [аоуұыэ]ю sf:йып:1
SFX N N 51
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]бу sf:іп:1
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ву sf:іп:1
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]гу sf:іп:1
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ғу sf:іп:1
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ду sf:іп:1
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]жу sf:іп:1
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]зу sf:іп:1
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ку sf:іп:1
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]қу sf:іп:1
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]лу sf:іп:1
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]му sf:іп:1
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ну sf:іп:1
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ңу sf:іп:1
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]һу sf:іп:1
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]пу sf:іп:1
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ру sf:іп:1
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]су sf:іп:1
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ту sf:іп:1
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]фу sf:іп:1
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ху sf:іп:1
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]цу sf:іп:1
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]чу sf:іп:1
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]шу sf:іп:1
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]щу sf:іп:1
SFX N у п [аоуұыэәеёиөүіюя]у sf:п:1
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]бу sf:ып:1
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]ву sf:ып:1
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]гу sf:ып:1
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]ғу sf:ып:1
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]ду sf:ып:1
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]жу sf:ып:1
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]зу sf:ып:1
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]ку sf:ып:1
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]қу sf:ып:1
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]лу sf:ып:1
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]му sf:ып:1
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]ну sf:ып:1
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]ңу sf:ып:1
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]һу sf:ып:1
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]пу sf:ып:1
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]ру sf:ып:1
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]су sf:ып:1
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]ту sf:ып:1
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]фу sf:ып:1
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]ху sf:ып:1
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]цу sf:ып:1
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]чу sf:ып:1
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]шу sf:ып:1
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]щу sf:ып:1
SFX N ю йіп [әеёиөүіюя]ю sf:йіп:1
SFX N ю йып [аоуұыэ]ю sf:йып:1
