hunspell/kk_KZ.modified.dic
айығу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
айқала/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
анодтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
аппаратына/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
астарлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
аттандас/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ашалау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ақтарт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
аңтарылу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
балқыту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
барымта/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
баялау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бейімдел/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бекіну/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
болжырау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бортаңдат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бунақтану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
білеулеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бітпес/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бұзаулау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бұрқақтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бәпекте/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
герметизациялау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
горчичник/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
дегбірсіздену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
деректеріне/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
дігерлеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
дүрс/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
егеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
емсек/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ерекшелеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
еңсегей/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жадыгөйсу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жалыну/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жар/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жарылу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жаңылысу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жел/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жс/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жібермеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жұлқынт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
зәкір/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
илігу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
кездегі/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
кергу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
кеңесін/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
кірти/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
күбіну/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
кәдіксіз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
көмкеру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
көрт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
маймаң/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
малтаңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
маңыздану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
маңғыстат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
монашка/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мою/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мұхамедрахым/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мәнерлеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
нейбет/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
омофон/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ораңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
оқытыл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
порын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
расталу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
рейсшина/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
салғыластыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сарылдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
себепсіз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сетінеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сонсын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сызғыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сымп/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сүйріктену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сұрай/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
талтақтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тамашалат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тақырыбы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тоздырту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тойшыла/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
торсықтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тоқыттыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тыжырайту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тыртың/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тықырлату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
түбегейл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
түйсіндіру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
түсіндіруге/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
түсініңкіреу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тұтқындау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тәкаппарсы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
төтелеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
уқалаттыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
цитат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шайқалдыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шарбақталу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шахар/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шақырғансу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шифрлану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шойнаңдаттыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шыжбалаңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шығындарын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ызғарлану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ырбаңдат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ірпі/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
іңгәлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қайнатпа/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қамдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қанағатшыл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қарындылау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қарғат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қашқақтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қақпала/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қиқымдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қолапайсыз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қорытындылау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қуарыңқыра/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қырсаусу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қырқылған/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
құлаштау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
құрметсіз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
үйірсектену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
үрпекбас/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ұлықтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
өзгерд/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
өкшелесу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
